Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 2
THE HIGHWAY LAW

43-1-201. Short title.

This part 2 shall be known and may be cited as the "Highway Law", and references to "this part 2" shall be understood to mean the highway law, including all its provisions.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 362, § 1.

C.L.

§ 1385.

CSA:

C. 143, § 92.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-1.

43-1-202. Public highways or roads.

All roads and highways which are, on May 4, 1921, by law open to public traffic shall be public highways within the meaning of this part 2.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 362, § 2.

C.L.

§ 1386.

CSA:

C. 143, § 93.

L. 45:

Ex. Sess., p. 41, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-2.

43-1-202.5. Public rights in roads - transfer of right-of-way.

If any road has been established by law, the transfer of all or any part of the property upon which such road is constructed to any party, including, but not limited to, any government agency, shall not act to vacate such road. No such transfer shall act to diminish the rights of any person in such a road.

If any public rights have been established by law in a road that provides access to any parcel of land, such rights may be transferred when such parcel of land is transferred.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 615, § 1, effective April 30.

43-1-202.7. Recording of documents vacating or abandoning a roadway.

If any roadway is vacated or abandoned by the state, by a county, or by a municipality, the documents vacating or abandoning such roadway, including but not necessarily limited to any resolution, ordinance, deed, conveyance document, plat, or survey, shall be recorded in the office of the clerk and recorder of the county in which such roadway is located.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 615, § 1, effective April 30.

43-1-203. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Highway" includes bridges on the roadway and culverts, sluices, drains, ditches, waterways, embankments, retaining walls, trees, shrubs, and fences along or upon the same and within the right-of-way, and any subsurface support acquired in accordance with section 43-1-209.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 362, § 3.

C.L.

§ 1387.

CSA:

C. 143, § 94.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-3.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 627, § 2, effective August 5.

43-1-204. State highway.

A "state highway" within the meaning of this part 2 is a right-of-way or location, whether actually used as a highway or not, designated for the construction of a state highway upon it.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 363, § 4.

C.L.

§ 1388.

CSA:

C. 143, § 95.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-4.

43-1-205. Offices.

The office of state planning and budgeting shall provide for the department of transportation suitable offices in the capitol or other state building at Denver at such rent and telephone or other expenses as are just and reasonable. Moneys for the payment of such rent and telephone or other expenses shall be paid from the department of transportation funds. In addition to the offices maintained in Denver, the department of transportation may maintain at its expense such additional offices in other towns or cities of the state as it may find necessary for the prosecution of its work.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 363, § 8.

C.L.

§ 1392.

CSA:

C. 143, § 99.

L. 41:

p. 658, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-5.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 822, § 19, effective July 18.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1091, § 105, effective July 1.

43-1-206. Attorney general legal advisor. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 21:

p. 369, § 16.

C.L.

§ 1400.

CSA:

C. 143, § 107.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-6.

L. 79:

Entire section repealed, p. 1590, § 2, effective February 22.

43-1-207. Petition for acceptance of road as state highway.

If a board of county commissioners desires to have the transportation commission accept as a state highway any section of road in the county, the board of county commissioners by resolution may so request the commission, and the chief engineer shall then examine the section of road referred to and report to the commission as to whether it is of such construction and in such state of repair as will make it proper to accept it as a state highway. The commission in its discretion may accept such section as a state highway.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 370, § 19.

C.L.

§ 1403.

CSA:

C. 143, § 110.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-7.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1091, § 106, effective July 1.

43-1-207.5. Colorado scenic byway program - criteria for designation - notice and hearing. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1485, § 1, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

Subsection (9) provided for the repeal of this section, effective May 15, 1995. (See L. 93, p. 1485.)

43-1-208. State highway - damages - eminent domain.

If the chief engineer deems it desirable to establish, open, relocate, widen, add mass transit to, or otherwise alter a portion of a state highway, negotiations to acquire the land have failed, and the chief engineer determines that filing a petition in condemnation pursuant to article 1 of title 38 is necessary or if the commission otherwise so requires, the chief engineer shall make a written report to the commission describing the portion of the highway to be established, opened, added to, or changed and the land of each landowner to be acquired by a petition in condemnation. The chief engineer shall accompany the report with a map showing the present and proposed boundaries of the portion of the highway to be established, opened, added to, or changed, together with an estimate of the damages and benefits accruing to each landowner against whose land a petition in condemnation will be filed. The chief engineer may also acquire land by purchase or exchange or through negotiations prior to the filing of a petition in condemnation and is not required to provide any information about land so acquired to the commission under this section.

If, upon receipt of the report and after providing ten days' written notice to the affected landowner of the date, time, and location of the commission meeting at which a resolution to authorize a proposed action and the filing of a petition in condemnation for land will be considered, which notice shall be sent by first-class mail to the mailing address, if any, of the land that is the subject of the resolution and any other mailing address of the landowner used for purposes of negotiations with the landowner, and providing the landowner with an opportunity to be heard at the meeting, the commission decides that public interest or convenience will be served by the proposed action and the filing of a petition in condemnation for the land pursuant to article 1 of title 38, it shall adopt a resolution approving the action and the filing of a petition in condemnation for the land. Thereupon the commission, acting through the department, shall proceed in the acquisition of the land, under articles 1 to 7 of title 38, without tender or other proceedings under this part 2.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commission may not acquire through condemnation any interest in oil, natural gas, or other mineral resources beneath land acquired as authorized by this section except to the extent required for subsurface support.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 370, § 20.

C.L.

§ 1404.

CSA:

C. 143, § 111.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-8.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 1091, § 107, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended and (4) added, p. 628, § 3, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2) amended and (3) repealed, (SB 19-017), ch. 67, p. 242, § 2, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-017, see section 1 of chapter 67, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

43-1-209. Subsurface support deemed acquired.

Whenever real property is acquired for road, highway, or mass transit purposes, whether such acquisition is by purchase, lease, or other means or by eminent domain, the right to subsurface support of such real property is deemed to be acquired therewith; except that no right to oil, natural gas, or other mineral resources beneath such real property shall be acquired by a governmental entity through condemnation unless the acquiring authority determines that such acquisition is required for subsurface support. In the event the acquiring authority determines that public convenience, necessity, and safety do not require such subsurface support or determines that only a part of such subsurface support is required for public convenience, necessity, and safety, such acquiring authority may specifically exclude such subsurface support, either in whole or in part, in such acquisition in accordance with said determination.

Source:

L. 53:

p. 511, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-9.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 628, § 4, effective August 5.

43-1-210. Acquisition and disposition of property - department of transportation renovation fund.

Whenever a part of a parcel of land is to be taken for state highway purposes and the remainder is to be left in such shape or condition as to be of little value to its owner or to give rise to claims or litigation concerning severance or other damage, the department of transportation may acquire by purchase or condemnation the whole parcel; except that the owner of said parcel may, at his option, retain the mineral or gravel interests therein, subject to the right to subsurface support retained by the department of transportation pursuant to section 43-1-209. The owner who retains said mineral or gravel interests shall not disturb the surface of the acquired parcel. The department of transportation may sell or lease the remainder of said parcel or may exchange the same for other property needed for state highway purposes.

The department of transportation may acquire by purchase, exchange, or condemnation excess right-of-way whenever in the opinion of the chief engineer public interest, safety, or convenience will be served by acquiring such excess. In connection with the construction, maintenance, and supervision of the public highways of this state, the department of transportation may also acquire by purchase, exchange, or condemnation strips or parcels of land, or interests therein, adjacent to federal-aid highways necessary for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty and for the development of rest, recreation, and sanitary areas; but no state funds shall be expended to acquire said strips or parcels of land, or interests therein, necessary for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of scenic beauty and for the development of rest, recreation, and sanitary areas unless the acquisition and development of land for such purposes is approved by the secretary of transportation to make the state eligible for reimbursement from federal funds.

The department of transportation has the authority to acquire by purchase, exchange, or condemnation rights-of-way for future needs for which rights-of-way have been identified in the current five-year highway program of projects and to lease any lands which are held for state highway purposes and are not presently needed therefor on such terms and conditions as the chief engineer, with the approval of the governor, may fix. When any right-of-way is to be acquired for future needs pursuant to this subsection (3), the department of transportation may obtain possession of such right-of-way pursuant to section 38-1-105 (6)(a), C.R.S., even though construction funds are not available at the time of acquisition, following the approval of an environmental assessment.

All moneys received from sale or rent of lands shall be deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the state highway fund.

The department of transportation is authorized, subject to approving resolution of the transportation commission, to dispose of any property or interest therein in the manner specified in this section which, in the opinion of the chief engineer, is no longer needed for transportation purposes. Subject to the provisions of this section, any sale or exchange of such property or interest shall be upon the terms and conditions as the commission and chief engineer, with the approval of the governor, may fix. Title to such property shall be transferred by appropriate instruments of conveyance, without warranties, and any moneys received shall be deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the state highway supplementary fund.
(5) (a) (I) The department of transportation is authorized, subject to approving resolution of the transportation commission, to dispose of any property or interest therein in the manner specified in this section which, in the opinion of the chief engineer, is no longer needed for transportation purposes. Subject to the provisions of this section, any sale or exchange of such property or interest shall be upon the terms and conditions as the commission and chief engineer, with the approval of the governor, may fix. Title to such property shall be transferred by appropriate instruments of conveyance, without warranties, and any moneys received shall be deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the state highway supplementary fund.

Prior to the disposal of any property or interest in any property that the department determines has an approximate value of more than twenty-five thousand dollars, the department shall obtain an appraisal from an appraiser, who is certified as a general appraiser under section

12-10-606

, to determine the fair market value of the property or interest.

If the department determines that the property or interest therein is of use only to one abutting owner or, in the case of an easement, to the underlying fee owner, the abutting owner or underlying fee owner shall have first right of refusal to purchase or exchange the property or interest therein upon which disposition is being made at the fair market value.

If the abutting owner or underlying fee owner refuses to exercise the first right of refusal to purchase or exchange the property or interest therein under subsection (5)(a)(III) of this section or if the department determines that such property or interest is of use to more than one owner or potential owner, any political subdivision of this state including but not limited to any state agency, city or town, or county located within the boundaries of the property or interest therein shall have first right of refusal to purchase or exchange such property or interest at the fair market value. During the first right of refusal period, the department of personnel, as part of the process described in section

24-82-102.5 (4)(a)

, may determine that the property being offered for sale by the department of transportation could be used for affordable housing, child care, or placement of renewable energy facilities, in which case their right of first refusal supersedes the right of any other political subdivision of the state.

If no political subdivision exercises its right of first refusal to purchase or exchange the property or interest therein pursuant to sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (IV), the department shall dispose of such property or interest by means of a sale or exchange for not less than its fair market value.

For any property or interest therein subject to disposition that the department determines has an approximate value of twenty-five thousand dollars or less, the department shall dispose of the property or interest by means of a sale or exchange at not less than its fair market value in the manner set forth in this subsection (5); except that, as specified in section

12-10-602 (9)(b)

(VI), the department may employ a right-of-way acquisition agent, a real estate appraiser who is licensed or certified pursuant to part 6 of article 10 of title 12, or any other individual who has sufficient understanding of the local real estate market to be qualified to make a waiver valuation to provide an estimate of the fair market value of such property or interest and to determine to whom the property or interest is of use.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 96, p. 1453, § 1, effective June 1, 1996.)

If the department is not able to dispose of the property or interest therein by means of a sale or exchange following a diligent effort for a five-year period, the department shall vacate such property or interest and title to such property or interest shall vest in accordance with the provisions of part 3 of article 2 of this title.

As used in this subsection (5), "exchange" means the transferring of property, including improvements, water rights, land, or interests in land or water rights, by the department to another person in consideration for the transfer to the department of other property, including improvements, water rights, land, or interests in land or water rights, cash, or services or other consideration thereof; except that any cash or services received may not exceed fifty percent of the total value of the consideration. A transaction otherwise qualifying as an exchange shall not be deemed a sale merely because dollar values have been assigned to any property, including improvements, water rights, land, or interests in land or water rights, for the purpose of ensuring that the department will receive adequate compensation.

and (7) Repealed.

Source:

L. 45:

p. 559, §§ 1-4.

CSA:

C. 143, § 112(1).

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-10.

L. 65:

p. 955, § 1.

L. 66:

p. 178, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 1234, § 1.

L. 85:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1195, § 7, effective June 6; (5)(a) amended, p. 1337, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(2), (3), (5)(a), and (5)(b) amended, p. 1549, § 1, effective April 16.

L. 91:

(1), (2), (3), and (5) amended, p. 1092, § 108, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 1016, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(5) amended, p. 1453, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 1097, § 13, effective June 1.

L. 2004:

(6) added, p. 1560, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 2012:

(7) added, (HB 12-1222), ch. 81, p. 270, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 2014:

(5)(a)(V) amended, (SB 14-117), ch. 385, p. 1923, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(5)(a)(II) and (5)(a)(V) amended, (HB 18-1349), ch. 254, p. 1558, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2019:

(5)(a)(II) and (5)(a)(V) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1733, § 261, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(5)(a)(IV)(A) amended, (HB 21-1274), ch. 263, p. 1536, § 3, effective September 7.

43-1-210.5. Rights-of-way use by adjacent landowners.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the department of transportation controls the use of thousands of acres of rights-of-way in Colorado for highway purposes. The general assembly further finds that, although the primary use of such rights-of-way is for highways, certain rights-of-way could also be used for productive agricultural purposes without reducing the suitability or safety of such rights-of-way for highway purposes and for authorized utility accommodations.

The department of transportation may issue permits to persons who own land adjacent to state highway rights-of-way so that such persons may use such rights-of-way for agricultural purposes. The executive director of the department of transportation, or the director's designee, shall promulgate rules and regulations which describe the terms, conditions, and purposes of such permits. Included in such regulations shall be a definition of adjacent landowner, a description of the types of agricultural uses allowed, the procedure which shall be used to obtain a permit, and any insurance requirements which the executive director finds appropriate. In no event shall a right-of-way permit be entered into which, in the judgment of the department, would not be in the best interests of the state or would be detrimental to the public health, safety, or welfare or in conflict with any applicable federal, state, or local law or for any agricultural purpose which involves irrigation. No right-of-way permit shall authorize the use for agricultural purposes of any median separating traffic lanes on a state highway, or where ownership of the right-of-way is not of public record.

The department of transportation may charge reasonable and necessary fees for the application and approval of any permits authorized by this section.

Prior to obtaining a permit from the department of transportation, the permittee shall show proof of insurance in the amount required by the department. The department of transportation shall not be liable for any property damage or injury which may result from the permitting of right-of-way as provided for in this section.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 1137, § 1, effective July 1.

43-1-211. Department to acquire land - buildings.

For the purpose of constructing, maintaining, and supervising the public highways of this state, the department of transportation is authorized to purchase land and cause to be erected thereon by a nonprofit corporation or authority buildings suitable for offices or for housing machines, tools, and equipment, or for both of such purposes.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 733, § 1.

CSA:

C. 143, § 175.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-11.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1093, § 109, effective July 1.

43-1-212. Department - rental agreements.

The department of transportation is authorized to enter into rental or leasehold agreements under which the department shall acquire title to such buildings within a period not exceeding thirty years upon payment of the stipulated aggregate annual rentals. The plans, specifications, bids, and contracts for such buildings and the terms of all such rental or leasehold agreements shall be approved by the governor, the chief engineer, a majority of the members of the commission, and the director of the office of state planning and budgeting. The rentals shall be paid solely out of the state highway fund, and the obligation to pay such rentals shall not constitute an indebtedness of the state or be paid out of any other fund. Such rental shall be included in the annual budgets of the department and shall be certified, audited, and paid in the same manner as all other accounts and expenditures payable out of said state highway fund.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 733, § 2.

CSA:

C. 143, § 176.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-12.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 822, § 20, effective July 18.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 970, § 25, effective July 1, 1984.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1093, § 110, effective July 1.

43-1-213. Fees and taxes - not reduced.

The excise fees and taxes payable into the state highway fund shall never be reduced to the extent that amounts payable into such fund are insufficient to comply with the terms of any rental or leasehold agreement entered into pursuant to this part 2.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 734, § 3.

CSA:

C. 143, § 177.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-13.

43-1-214. Property exempt from taxation.

Property acquired or occupied pursuant to this part 2 shall be exempt from taxation so long as it is used for state highway or other public purposes.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 734, § 4.

CSA:

C. 143, § 178.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-14.

43-1-215. Agreements enforceable.

Purchase or leasehold agreements entered into by the department of transportation pursuant to this part 2 shall be enforceable in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 51:

p. 734, § 5.

CSA:

C. 143, § 179.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-15.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1094, § 111, effective July 1.

43-1-216. Notices and tenders by mail.

All notices to landowners referred to in this part 2 may be given by mailing the same to such landowners. All tenders of payment of damages to landowners referred to in this part 2 may be made by mailing to each landowner to whom such tender is to be made a written or printed statement reciting the action of the chief engineer and of the commission relating to the award of damages to such landowner, specifying the amount of damages awarded to him, and stating where and by whom payment of the sum so awarded will be made upon demand of such landowner. Depositing in the general post office in the city of Denver or at the county seat of the county in which the land in controversy is located a written or printed copy of any notice referred to in this section, or any statement tendering payment of damages, signed by the proper officer, enclosed in a sealed envelope with proper postage prepaid, and properly addressed to the landowner at his last known place of residence or address, is sufficient mailing of the same for the purpose of this part 2.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 372, § 22.

C.L.

§ 1406.

CSA:

C. 143, § 113.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-16.

43-1-217. Inclusion of streets in highways.

For all of the purposes of this part 2 and, with respect to state highways, for all the purposes of part 1 of article 3 of this title, state highways or county highways may be designated, established, and constructed in, into, or through cities and counties, cities, or towns when such highways form necessary or convenient connecting links for carrying state highways or county highways into or through such cities and counties, cities, or towns, and for such purposes the department of transportation and the boards of county commissioners of the several counties may condemn or otherwise acquire rights-of-way and access rights.

Each county highway in a city or town shall be maintained by such city or town. Each state highway in a city and county, city, or town shall be maintained by the department of transportation. By agreement between any such city and county, city, or town, and the chief engineer with respect to a state highway or the board of county commissioners with respect to a county highway, the department of transportation or the board of county commissioners, as the case may be, may agree to perform or pay for all or a part of the maintenance of such state or county highway in such city and county, city, or town.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 373, § 23.

C.L.

§ 1407.

CSA:

C. 143, § 114.

L. 45, 1st Ex. Sess.

p. 41, § 2.

L. 47:

p. 764, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-17.

L. 67:

p. 85, § 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1094, § 112, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For provisions similar to those in subsection (2) of this section, see §§ 43-2-103 and 43-2-104.

43-1-218. State and school lands.

The provisions of this part 2 shall apply to state lands and school lands as well as other lands.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 373, § 24.

C.L.

§ 1408.

CSA:

C. 143, § 115.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-18.

43-1-219. Funds created.

There are hereby created two separate funds, one to be known as the state highway fund and the other to be known as the state highway supplementary fund. All money paid into either of the funds shall be available immediately, without further appropriation, for the purposes of the fund as provided by law. Money transferred to the state highway fund pursuant to section 24-75-219 (7)(c) and (7)(f) and any interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of such money may be expended for multimodal projects, as defined in section 43-4-1102 (5). Any sums paid into the state treasury, which by law belong to the state highway fund or to the state highway supplementary fund, shall be immediately placed by the state treasurer to the credit of the appropriate fund. Upon request of the commission or of the chief engineer, it is the duty of the state treasurer to report to the commission or to the chief engineer the amount of money on hand in each of the two funds and the amounts derived from each source from which each such fund is accumulated. All accounts and expenditures from each of the two funds shall be certified by the chief engineer and paid by the state treasurer upon warrants drawn by the controller. The controller is authorized as directed to draw warrants payable out of the specified fund upon such vouchers properly certified and audited. Nothing in this part 2 shall operate to alter the manner of the execution and issuance of transportation revenue anticipation notes provided in part 7 of article 4 of this title 43.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 373, § 25.

C.L.

§ 1409.

L. 35:

p. 463, § 2.

CSA:

C. 143, § 116.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-19.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 1119, § 4, effective June 2.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 290, § 44, effective August 8.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1416, § 31, effective June 17.

Cross references:

(1) For the transfer to the state highway supplementary fund of moneys paid to the department of transportation for expenses incurred in conducting the closure of highways for athletic or special events, see § 24-33.5-226 (3)(d).

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-1-220. Sources of funds - assumption of obligations.

All receipts from the following sources shall be paid into and credited to the state highway fund as soon as received from:

Such appropriation as may, from time to time, be made by law to the state highway fund from excise tax revenues;

All revenue accruing to the state highway fund under the provisions of law, by way of excise taxation from the imposition of any license, registration fee, or other charge with respect to the operation of any motor vehicle upon any public highways in this state, and the proceeds from the imposition of any excise tax on gasoline or other liquid motor fuel.

Repealed.

All receipts from the following sources shall be paid into and credited to the state highway supplementary fund as soon as received from:

Such appropriations as may, from time to time, be made by law to the state highway supplementary fund;

All receipts from the sale of bonds that may be authorized by the people of the state for state highway purposes;

The federal government or any department thereof for the purpose of constructing, improving, or maintaining state highways, and from all public donations for such purpose. All such donations shall be paid to the credit of the state highway supplementary fund for such particular purpose as may be indicated by the donor. The state treasurer shall not receive any gift for such purpose without the approval of the board.

Private investors representing advances for or purchase price of state highway fund revenue anticipation warrants;

All moneys for state highway purposes from sources other than those specified in subsection (1) of this section;

Contributions, revenues, or income pursuant to section 43-1-1205;

Any proceeds from the issuance of transportation revenue anticipation notes in accordance with part 7 of article 4 of this title; and

Any revenues received from political subdivisions pursuant to section 43-4-709, including but not limited to federal transportation funds as defined in section 43-4-702 (4).

Source:

L. 21:

p. 374, § 26.

C.L.

§ 1410.

L. 35:

p. 464, § 3.

CSA:

C. 143, § 117.

L. 36, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

p. 18, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-20.

L. 59:

p. 630, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-20.

L. 94:

(1)(c) added, p. 1217, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 95:

(2)(f) added, p. 261, § 3, effective April 17.

L. 99:

(2)(g) and (2)(h) added, p. 1119, § 5, effective June 2.

L. 2011:

(1)(c) repealed, (SB 11-159), ch. 54, p. 145, § 9, effective March 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1995 act enacting subsection (2)(f), see section 1 of chapter 90, Session Laws of Colorado 1995.

43-1-221. Proceeds from sale of bonds.

The proceeds from the sale of any bonds that may be authorized for state highways shall be expended only for such purposes as are specified in the law authorizing the issue of the bonds and not more than ten percent of any bond issue for administrative and engineering purposes.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 376, § 28.

C.L.

§ 1412.

CSA:

C. 143, § 119.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-21.

43-1-222. Cash available for small payments.

In order that the chief engineer may make immediate cash payment to laborers and in other instances where, in his or her judgment, it is advantageous or necessary for the conducting of the work supervised by the chief engineer to make such payments, the state treasurer shall deposit in a bank in the city and county of Denver, Colorado, from the state highway fund, the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars, which must be made payable upon order of the chief engineer in the form of a voucher check, the voucher to show to whom and for what payment is made. A duplicate of all such vouchers shall be retained in the office of the chief engineer. An amount equal to the checks returned and found in proper form shall thereupon be deposited by the state treasurer to the credit of such special fund from the state highway fund. Voucher checks drawn upon the special fund shall not be used to pay salaries of officers or regular employees of the department.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 377, § 31.

C.L.

§ 1415.

CSA:

C. 143, § 122.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-22.

L. 65:

p. 159, § 11.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1094, § 113, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1209), ch. 64, p. 176, § 7, effective March 30.

43-1-223. Supervision of construction.

If, as the result of any agreement made by the department of transportation on behalf of the state and any branch of the federal government, there is undertaken actual construction or improvement of highways in the state, the letting of contracts and preparation and approval of specifications and plans, together with supervision of construction, shall, on behalf of the state, be under the direct control of the chief engineer, subject to the terms of the agreement so made. No agreement or contract shall be made which requires the expenditure of funds greater than that included in the budget for the current fiscal year plus additional advances from the federal government and from private investors made after the date of the budget.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 378, § 32.

C.L.

§ 1416.

L. 35:

p. 468, § 6.

CSA:

C. 143, § 123.

L. 36, 2nd Ex. Sess.:

p. 21, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-23.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1095, § 114, effective July 1.

43-1-224. Cooperation with federal departments.

The department of transportation is further authorized to cooperate in such manner as it may consider for the public benefit with any department of the federal government in undertaking any experiments or collecting any data that has to do with public highways.

Source:

L. 21:

p. 378, § 33.

C.L.

§ 1417.

CSA:

C. 143, § 124.

CRS 53:

§ 120-3-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-24.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1095, § 115, effective July 1.

43-1-225. Power of transportation commission - relocation of utility facilities - payment of cost.

The transportation commission has the following powers in addition to the powers now possessed by it: To make reasonable regulations for the installation, construction, maintenance, repair, renewal, and relocation of tracks, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and other equipment and appliances or connections thereto, called "utility facilities" in this section, of any governmental subdivision of the state of Colorado or of an abutting landowner in, on, along, over, across, through, or under any project on the federal-aid primary or secondary systems or on the interstate system, including extensions thereof within urban areas. Whenever the commission determines that it is necessary that any such utility facilities which may be located in, on, along, over, across, through, or under any such federal-aid primary or secondary system or on the interstate system, including extensions thereof within urban areas, should be relocated, the governmental subdivision of the state of Colorado or abutting landowner owning or operating such facilities shall relocate the same in accordance with the order of the commission; but the cost of relocation shall be paid to the governmental subdivision of the state of Colorado or abutting landowner so ordered to relocate its utility facilities without discrimination or impairment on account of any agreement entered into by any department, commission, or governmental subdivision of this state. In case of any such relocation of utility facilities, as provided in this section, the governmental subdivision of the state of Colorado or abutting landowner owning or operating the same may maintain and operate such utility facilities, with the necessary appurtenances, in the new location. Said payment of costs shall be made from the state highway fund or the state highway supplementary fund upon due certification made by the chief engineer and paid by the state treasurer upon warrants drawn by the controller as provided for and authorized by section 43-1-219.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Governmental subdivision" includes a county or city and county, a city or town, a municipal or quasi-municipal corporation, and a school district.

"Cost of relocation" includes the entire amount paid by such governmental subdivision of the state of Colorado properly attributable to such relocation after deducting therefrom any increase in the value of the new facility and any salvage value derived from the old facility.

The cost of relocating utility facilities owned by any governmental subdivision of the state of Colorado or abutting landowner on the federal-aid primary or secondary systems or on the interstate system, including extensions thereof within urban areas, shall be a cost of highway construction.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 957, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-25.

L. 91:

(1) amended, p. 1095, § 116, effective July 1.

43-1-226. Legislative declaration.

It is declared to be the purpose of the general assembly in the passage of section 43-1-225 that the state of Colorado may more fully avail itself of the benefits of funds apportioned for expenditure on federal-aid primary or secondary systems and on the interstate system, including extensions thereof within urban areas, in conformance with the "Federal-Aid Road Act", approved July 11, 1916, and all acts of the congress amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto.

Source:

L. 65:

p. 957, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-3-26.

Cross references:

For the "Federal-Aid Road Act", actually titled "An act to provide that the United States shall aid the States in the construction of rural post roads, and for other purposes.", see 39 Stat. 355. For current provisions pertaining to the "Federal-Aid Road Act", see 23 U.S.C. §§ 101, 202, 204, 205.